Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1011
Branding, defined.

Branding means a permanent mark made on human tissue by burning with a hot iron or other instrument.

Laws 2004, LB 906, § 10;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-346.04;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 273.